Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.016

Code correction—Committee orders.

The committee may at any time by order correct any section or portion of the code in any of the respects enumerated in RCW 1.08.015. Orders shall be numbered consecutively and signed by the committee chair and each order shall be followed by an explanatory note reciting the reason therefor.

Unless otherwise prescribed in the orders, each shall become effective ninety days after:

(1) Signing of the order; and

(2) Filing a summary thereof with the board of governors of the state bar association; and

(3) The filing thereof with the secretary of state.

[ 2011 c 336 s 2; 1953 c 257 s 5.]